Utah statutes.
53A-17a-111.5.   Districts to provide class space for deaf and blind programs.

(1)  School districts with students who reside within their boundaries and are served by the Schools for the Deaf and the Blind shall:

(a)  furnish the schools with space required for their programs; or

(b)  help pay for the cost of leasing classroom space in other school districts.

(2)  A district's participation in the program under Subsection (1) is based upon the number of students who are served by the Schools for the Deaf and the Blind and who reside within the district as compared to the state total of students who are served by the schools.



Amended by Chapter 221, 2003 General Session

